New York, session 2025-2026, A11176.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 296 of the execu- 2 tive law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 5 to read as follows: 3 (5) (i) To inquire about or require disclosure of citizenship or immi- 4 gration status; 5 (ii) To require specific immigration documentation, including but not 6 limited to a green card or similar documentation, as the sole acceptable 7 form of identification; 8 (iii) To disclose a tenant's immigration or citizenship status to 9 third parties, including but not limited to federal authorities, except 10 when required by court order; or 11 (iv) To report or threaten to report a tenant's citizenship or immi- 12 gration status to immigration authorities in retaliation for asserting 13 rights under this chapter or any other provision of law. 14 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 296 of the executive law is amended by 15 adding a new paragraph (i) to read as follows: 16 (i) The provisions of subparagraph five of paragraph (a) of this 17 subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an owner, lessee, sub- 18 lessee, assignee, or managing agent of, or other person having the right 19 to sell, rent or lease a housing accommodation, constructed or to be 20 constructed, or any agent or employee thereof, from: 21 (1) verifying the identity of a potential tenant or conducting other 22 standard tenant screening practices that are otherwise lawful; provided, 23 however, that such identity verification or other standard tenant 24 screening practice shall not impose heightened requirements based on 25 citizenship or immigration status; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14712-01-6 A. 11176 2 1 (2) complying with federal requirements regarding citizenship or immi- 2 gration status for federally subsidized housing programs that would 3 otherwise be prohibited under this chapter. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.